Arkansas, session 2025, HB1955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 8, Chapter 14, is repealed.
CHAPTER 14
SHIELDED OUTDOOR LIGHTING ACT

8-14-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Shielded Outdoor
Lighting Act”.

8-14-102. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to conserve energy and preserve the
environment through the regulation of outdoor lighting fixtures.

8-14-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Outdoor lighting fixture” means an automatically
controlled, outdoor artificial illuminating device, whether permanent or
portable, used for illumination or advertisement, including searchlights,
spotlights, and floodlights, whether for architectural lighting, parking lot
*JMB287*
04-10-2025 09:33:26 JMB287

As Engrossed: H4/10/25 HB1955
lighting, landscape lighting, billboards, or street lighting; and
(2) “Shielded” means a fixture that is covered in a manner that
light rays emitted by the fixture, either directly from the lamp or
indirectly from the fixture, are projected below a horizontal plane running
through the lowest point on the fixture where light is emitted.

8-14-104. Shielding — Prohibitions — Exemptions.
(a)(1)(A) No public funds shall be used to install an outdoor lighting
fixture unless it is shielded.
(B) Subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section does not apply
to any municipality or county if the governing body of the municipality or
county determines by ordinance or to a municipally owned utility if the
municipal employee responsible for procurement determines that the cost of
acquiring a shielded outdoor lighting fixture will be prohibitive after
comparing:
(i) The cost of the fixtures; and
(ii) The projected energy cost of the operation of
the fixtures.
(2) The Division of Environmental Quality shall promulgate rules
prohibiting any person or entity from knowingly placing or disposing of the
bulb or tube portion of an electric lighting device containing hazardous
levels of mercury in a landfill if:
(A) The electric lighting device contains more than two-
tenths milligram per liter (0.2 mg/l) of leachable mercury as measured by the
Toxicity Characteristic Leaching Procedure as set out in United States
Environmental Protection Agency Test Method 1311; and
(B) Adequate facilities exist for the public to properly
dispose of the electric lighting device described in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of
this section.
(3)(A) Each electric public utility shall offer a shielded
lighting service option.
(B) Each electric public utility shall file an application
with the Arkansas Public Service Commission to establish a schedule of rates
and charges for the provision of a shielded lighting service option to the
utility's customers.
(C) The commission shall require each electric public
04-10-2025 09:33:26 JMB287

As Engrossed: H4/10/25 HB1955
utility to inform its customers of the availability of the shielded lighting
service.
(b) This chapter does not apply to acquisitions of:
(1) Incandescent outdoor lighting fixtures of one hundred fifty
watts (150 W) or less or other light sources of seventy watts (70 W) or less;
(2) Outdoor lighting fixtures on advertisement signs on
interstate or federal primary highways;
(3)(A) Outdoor lighting fixtures existing and legally installed
before August 12, 2005.
(B) However, if an existing outdoor lighting fixture
exempted from this chapter under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section needs
to be replaced, the acquisition of the replacement outdoor lighting fixture
shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter;
(4) Navigational lighting systems at airports or other lighting
necessary for aircraft safety; and
(5) Outdoor lighting fixtures that are necessary for worker
safety at farms, ranches, dairies, or feedlots or industrial, mining, or oil
and gas facilities.
(c) This chapter does not apply to outdoor lighting fixtures
maintained or installed by:
(1) A public school district;
(2) A correctional facility;
(3) A juvenile detention facility;
(4) An adult detention facility;
(5) A mental health facility; or
(6) A state-supported institution of higher education.

8-14-105. Penalties.
Violations of this chapter are punishable by:
(1) A warning for a first offense; and
(2) A fine of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) minus the replacement
cost for each offending outdoor lighting fixture for a second or subsequent
offense or for an offense that continues for thirty (30) calendar days from
the date of the warning.

8-14-106. Enforcement.
04-10-2025 09:33:26 JMB287

As Engrossed: H4/10/25 HB1955
This chapter may be enforced by a town, city, or county of this state
by seeking injunctive relief in a court of competent jurisdiction.

8-14-107. Provisions supplemental.
The provisions of this chapter are cumulative and supplemental and
shall not apply within a town, city, or county of this state that by
ordinance has adopted provisions restricting light pollution that are equal
to or more stringent than the provisions of this chapter.

/s/S. Meeks


























04-10-2025 09:33:26 JMB287